Mississippi, session 2026, HB706.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 47-5-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 47-5-103.  (1)  The classification hearing officer shall be responsible for assigning a classification to each offender within forty (40) days after the offender's commitment to the custody of the department.  The classification shall determine the offender's work duties, living quarters, which shall also include the needed determination, as provided under subsection (4) of this section, for a nonviolent offender who has a sentence of ten (10) years or less or who has ten (10) years or less remaining on his or her sentence, educational, vocational or other rehabilitation programs, and privileges to be accorded the offender while in custody of the department.  The classification hearing officer, in assigning classifications, shall consider the offender's age, offense and surrounding circumstances, the complete record of the offender's criminal history, including records of law enforcement agencies or of a youth court regarding that offender's juvenile criminal history, family background, education, practical or employment experience, interests and abilities as evidenced by mental and psychological examination and knowledge obtained by the classification hearing officer in personal interview with the offender.  The classification hearing officer shall use the above criteria to assign each offender a classification which will serve and enhance the best interests and general welfare of the offender.  The designee or designees of the commissioner shall approve or disapprove each classification.  The classification hearing officer shall provide the State Parole Board with a copy of the classification assigned to each offender in the custody of the department who is eligible for parole. (2)  The classification board, consisting of the commissioner, or his designee, deputy commissioner of institutions and the director of offender services may change an action of the classification or disciplinary hearing officer if the board makes a determination that the action of the hearing officer was not supported by sufficient factual information.  The commissioner, in emergency situations, may suspend the classification of an offender or offenders for a period of not exceeding fifteen (15) days to relieve the emergency situation.  The classification of each offender may be reviewed by a classification hearing officer at least once each year.  In no case shall an offender serve as a servant in the home of any employee other than authorized by the commissioner. (3)  The classification board shall establish substantive and procedural rules and regulations governing the assignment and alteration of inmate classifications, and shall make such rules and regulations available to any offender upon request. (4)  From and after July 1, 2026, the Department of Corrections shall house any nonviolent offender, including those who were incarcerated before July 1, 2026, within a one hundred (100) mile radius of the offender's release residence if the nonviolent offender has a sentence of ten (10) years or less or has ten (10) years remaining on his or her sentence. SECTION 2.  Section 47-4-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 47-4-1.  (1)  It is lawful for there to be located within Wilkinson County and Leflore County a correctional facility operated entirely by a private entity pursuant to a contractual agreement between such private entity and the federal government, any state, or a political subdivision of any state to provide correctional services to any such public entity for the confinement of inmates subject to the jurisdiction of such public entity.  Any person confined in such a facility pursuant to the laws of the jurisdiction from which he is sent shall be considered lawfully confined within this state.  The private entity shall assume complete responsibility for the inmates and shall be liable to the State of Mississippi for any illegal or tortious actions of such inmates. (2)  The Department of Corrections shall contract with the Board of Supervisors of Leflore County for the private incarceration of not more than one thousand (1,000) state inmates at a facility in Leflore County.  Any contract must comply with the requirements of Section 47-5-1211 through Section 47-5-1227. (3)  It is lawful for any county to contract with a private entity for the purpose of providing correctional services for the confinement of federal inmates subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.  Any person confined in such a facility pursuant to the laws of the United States shall be considered lawfully confined within this state.  The private entity shall assume complete responsibility for the inmates and shall be liable to the county or the State of Mississippi, as the case may be, for any illegal or tortious actions of the inmates. (4)  It is lawful for there to be located within any county a correctional facility operated entirely by a private entity and the federal government to provide correctional services to the United States for the confinement of federal inmates subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.  Any person confined in a facility pursuant to the laws of the United States shall be considered lawfully confined within this state.  The private entity shall assume complete responsibility for the inmates and shall be liable to the State of Mississippi for any illegal or tortious actions of the inmates. A person convicted of simple assault on an employee of a private correctional facility while such employee is acting within the scope of his or her duty or employment shall be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both. A person convicted of aggravated assault on an employee of a private correctional facility while such employee is acting within the scope of his or her duty or employment shall be punished by a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) years, or both. (5)  The Department of Corrections may contract with the Tallahatchie County Correctional Facility authorized in Chapter 904, Local and Private Laws of 1999, for the private incarceration of not more than one thousand (1,000) state inmates at a facility in Tallahatchie County.  Any contract must comply with the requirements of Section 47-5-1211 through Section 47-5-1227.  No state inmate shall be assigned to the Tallahatchie County Correctional Facility unless the inmate cost per day is at least ten percent (10%) less than the inmate cost per day for housing a state inmate at a state correctional facility. (6)  If a private entity houses state inmates, the private entity shall not displace state inmate beds with federal inmate beds unless the private entity has obtained prior written approval from the Commissioner of Corrections. (7)  It is lawful for there to be located within Leflore County a correctional facility operated entirely by a private entity pursuant to a contractual agreement between such private entity and the federal government, the State of Mississippi, or Leflore County for the incarceration of federal inmates.  Such correctional facility may include a separate Leflore County jail which may be located on or adjacent to the correctional facility site.  To further the provisions of this subsection: (a)  Any private entity, the State of Mississippi, or Leflore County may enter into any agreement regarding real property or property, including, but not limited to, a lease, a ground lease and leaseback arrangement, a sublease or any other lease agreement or arrangement, as lessor or lessee.  Such agreements shall not exceed forty (40) years.  The Department of Corrections may enter such agreements or arrangements on behalf of the State of Mississippi; (b)  The powers conferred under this subsection shall be additional and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law.  Where the provisions of this subsection conflict with other law, this subsection shall control; and (c)  The private entity shall assume complete responsibility for the inmates and shall be liable to the State of Mississippi for any illegal or tortious actions of the inmates. (8)  From and after July 1, 2026, any private entity that houses a state nonviolent offender shall house such offender, including such offender who was incarcerated before July 1, 2026, within a one hundred (100) mile radius of the offender's release residence if the nonviolent offender has a sentence of ten (10) years or less or has ten (10) years remaining on his or her sentence. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.